Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.060

Procedures governing adjudicative proceedings.

The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, govern all hearings before the disciplinary authority. The disciplinary authority has, in addition to the powers and duties set forth in this chapter, all of the powers and duties under chapter 34.05 RCW, which include, without limitation, all powers relating to the administration of oaths, the receipt of evidence, the issuance and enforcing of subpoenas, and the taking of depositions.

[ 2002 c 86 s 107.]